Arkansas, session 2025, SB256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-54-104(a)(6)(B), concerning the annual
franchise tax for certain corporations, is amended to read as follows:
(B) No corporation shall pay an annual tax of less than
one hundred fifty dollars ($150) one hundred dollars ($100);

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.








*CEB162*
02/19/2025 8:46:32 AM CEB162